Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1104
Violations; penalties.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a violation of section 2-1103 is a Class III felony.

(2) A violation of section 2-1103 is a Class IIA felony if the violation:

(a) Involves concealment of the origin of a high-risk agricultural pathogen or pest;

(b) Is committed by a person acting on behalf of, or funded by, a foreign government; or

(c) Results in actual economic damage exceeding one million dollars.

Laws 2026, LB1096, § 4.
July 18, 2026